Washington statutes.
RCW 1.20.130

Preferred terminology in government documents.

(1) All state and local government statutes, codes, rules, regulations, and other official documents enacted after July 1, 2002, are required to use the term "Asian" when referring to persons of Asian descent. The use of the term "Oriental" is prohibited.

(2) The legislature urges all state and local entities to review their statutes, codes, rules, regulations, and other official documents and revise them to omit the use of the term "Oriental" when referring to persons of Asian descent.

[ 2002 c 307 s 2.]

NOTES:

Finding—2002 c 307: "The legislature finds that the use of the term "Oriental" when used to refer to persons of Asian descent is outdated and pejorative. There is a need to make clear that the term "Asian" is preferred terminology, and that this more modern and nonpejorative term must be used to replace outdated terminology." [ 2002 c 307 s 1.]

Effective date—2002 c 307: "This act takes effect July 1, 2002." [ 2002 c 307 s 4.]